Utah statutes.
53A-8-106.   Career employee status for provisional employees.
(1)  A provisional employee must work for a school district on at least a
half-time basis for three consecutive years to obtain career employee status.
(2)  Policies of an employing school district shall determine the status of a
career employee in the event of the following:
(a)  the employee accepts a position which is substantially different from the
position in which career status was achieved; or
(b)  the employee accepts employment in another school district.
(3)  If an employee who is under an order of probation or remediation in one
assignment in a school district is transferred or given a new assignment in
the district, the order shall stand until its provisions are satisfied.
(4)  An employee who is given extra duty assignments in addition to a primary
assignment, such as a teacher who also serves as a coach or activity advisor,
is a temporary employee in those extra duty assignments and may not acquire
career status beyond the primary assignment.
(5)  A person is an at-will employee and is not eligible for career employee
status if the person:
(a)  is a teacher who holds a competency-based license pursuant to Section
53A-6-104.5 and does not hold a level 1, 2, or 3 license as defined in Section
53A-6-103; or
(b)  holds an administrative/supervisory letter of authorization pursuant to
Section 53A-6-110.
